Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1113
Purpose of act; legislative intent.

The purpose of the Aging and Disability Resource Center Act is to provide information about long-term care services and support available in the home and community for older Nebraskans or persons with disabilities, family caregivers, and persons who request information or assistance on behalf of others and to assist eligible individuals to access the most appropriate public and private resources to meet their long-term care needs.

It is the intent of the Legislature that aging and disability resource centers serve as an ongoing component of Nebraska's long-term care continuum and that aging and disability resource center sites coordinate and establish partnerships as necessary with organizations specializing in serving aging persons and persons with disabilities to provide the services described in the act.

Laws 2015, LB320, § 3;

Laws 2018, LB793, § 2.